California, session 20252026, AB1501.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2460 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2460. (a) There is created in the Department of Consumer Affairs the Podiatric Medical Board of California. Any reference in any provision of law to the California Board of Podiatric Medicine shall be deemed to refer to the Podiatric Medical Board of California. (b) The amendments made by Chapter 775 of the Statutes of 2017 relating to podiatrists shall not be construed to change any rights or privileges held by podiatrists prior to the enactment of that act.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 2460.1 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2460.1. Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of Section 2460 renders the Podiatric Medical Board of California subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. SEC. 3. Section 2460.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended and renumbered to read:2460.2. Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Podiatric Medical Board of California in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.SEC. 4. Section 2470 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2470. The board may adopt, amend, or repeal, in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), regulations necessary to enable the board to carry into effect the provisions of law relating to the practice of podiatric medicine.SEC. 5. Section 2472 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2472. (a) The certificate to practice podiatric medicine authorizes the holder to practice podiatric medicine.(b) As used in this chapter, “podiatric medicine” means the diagnosis, medical, surgical, mechanical, manipulative, and electrical treatment of the human foot, including the ankle and tendons that insert into the foot and the nonsurgical treatment of the muscles and tendons of the leg governing the functions of the foot.(c) A doctor of podiatric medicine shall not administer an anesthetic other than local. If an anesthetic other than local is required for any procedure, the anesthetic shall be administered by another licensed health care practitioner who is authorized to administer the required anesthetic within the scope of their practice.(d) (1) A doctor of podiatric medicine may do the following:(A) Perform surgical treatment of the ankle and tendons at the level of the ankle pursuant to subdivision (e).(B) Perform services under the direct supervision of a physician and surgeon, as an assistant at surgery, in surgical procedures that are otherwise beyond the scope of practice of a doctor of podiatric medicine.(C) Perform a partial amputation of the foot no further proximal than the Chopart’s joint.(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to permit a doctor of podiatric medicine to function as a primary surgeon for any procedure beyond their scope of practice.(e) A doctor of podiatric medicine may perform surgical treatment of the ankle and tendons at the level of the ankle only in the following locations:(1) A licensed general acute care hospital, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.(2) A licensed surgical clinic, as defined in Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, if the doctor of podiatric medicine has surgical privileges, including the privilege to perform surgery on the ankle, in a general acute care hospital described in paragraph (1) and meets all the protocols of the surgical clinic.(3) An ambulatory surgical center that is certified to participate in the Medicare Program under Title XVIII (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.) of the federal Social Security Act, if the doctor of podiatric medicine has surgical privileges, including the privilege to perform surgery on the ankle, in a general acute care hospital described in paragraph (1) and meets all the protocols of the surgical center.(4) A freestanding physical plant housing outpatient services of a licensed general acute care hospital, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, if the doctor of podiatric medicine has surgical privileges, including the privilege to perform surgery on the ankle, in a general acute care hospital described in paragraph (1). For purposes of this section, a “freestanding physical plant” means any building that is not physically attached to a building where inpatient services are provided.(5) An outpatient setting accredited pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1248.1 of the Health and Safety Code.(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a doctor of podiatric medicine with training or experience in wound care may treat ulcers resulting from local and systemic etiologies on the leg no further proximal than the tibial tubercle.SEC. 6. Section 2474 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2474. (a) Any person who uses in any sign or in any advertisement or otherwise, the word or words “doctor of podiatric medicine,” “doctor of podiatry,” “podiatric doctor,” “podiatric surgeon,” “D.P.M.,” “podiatrist,” “foot specialist,” or any other term or terms or any letters indicating or implying that they are a doctor of podiatric medicine, or that they practice podiatric medicine, or hold themselves out as practicing podiatric medicine or foot correction as defined in Section 2472, without having at the time of so doing a valid, unrevoked, and unsuspended certificate as provided for in this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.(b) It is the policy of this state that a doctor of podiatric medicine shall be classified or treated as a doctor of podiatric medicine and shall not be classified or treated as an ancillary provider or other allied health professional in any health care setting or insurance reimbursement structure for any purpose.SEC. 7. Section 2488 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2488. The board shall issue a certificate to practice podiatric medicine by credentialing if the applicant has submitted directly to the board from the credentialing organizations verification that they are licensed as a doctor of podiatric medicine in any other state and meets all of the following requirements:(a) The applicant has graduated from an approved school or college of podiatric medicine.(b) The applicant has passed either part III of the examination administered by the National Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners of the United States or a written examination that is recognized by the board to be the equivalent in content to the examination administered by the National Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners of the United States.(c) The applicant has satisfactorily completed a postgraduate training program approved by the Council on Podiatric Medical Education.(d) The applicant has passed any oral and practical examination that may be required of all applicants by the board to ascertain clinical competence.(e) The applicant has committed no acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of a certificate under Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).(f) The board determines that no disciplinary action has been taken against the applicant by any podiatric licensing authority and that the applicant has not been the subject of adverse judgments or settlements resulting from the practice of podiatric medicine that the board determines constitutes evidence of a pattern of negligence or incompetence.(g) A disciplinary databank report regarding the applicant is received by the board from the Federation of Podiatric Medical Boards.SEC. 8. Section 2499.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2499.5. The following fees apply to certificates to practice podiatric medicine. The amount of fees prescribed for doctors of podiatric medicine shall be determined by the board and shall be as described below. Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be fixed by the board in amounts not to exceed the actual costs of providing the service for which the fee is collected.(a) Each applicant for a certificate to practice podiatric medicine shall pay an application fee of one hundred dollars ($100) at the time the application is filed. If the applicant qualifies for a certificate, they shall pay a fee of one hundred dollars ($100).(b) Each applicant who qualifies for a certificate, as a condition precedent to its issuance, in addition to other fees required by this section, shall pay an initial license fee. The initial license fee shall be eight hundred dollars ($800). The initial license shall expire the second year after its issuance on the last day of the month of birth of the licensee. The board may reduce the initial license fee by up to 50 percent of the amount of the fee for any applicant who is enrolled in a postgraduate training program approved by the board or who has completed a postgraduate training program approved by the board within six months prior to the payment of the initial license fee.(c) The biennial renewal fee shall be one thousand nine hundred dollars ($1,900). Any licensee enrolled in an approved residency program shall be required to pay only 50 percent of the biennial renewal fee at the time of their first renewal.(d) The delinquency fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150).(e) The duplicate certificate fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100).(f) The letter of good standing fee or for loan deferment shall be one hundred dollars ($100).(g) There shall be a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for the issuance of a resident’s license under Section 2475.(h) The fee for approval of a continuing education course or program shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250).SEC. 9. Section 3502.35 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:3502.35. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that, in recognition of the vital role physician assistants play in delivering safe, effective, and accessible health care across California, a comprehensive review of practice agreement structures be undertaken in consultation with relevant stakeholders. This review should consider how practice agreements are utilized in other states and evaluate their potential benefits or detriments to patient care, workforce efficiency, and regulatory oversight.(b) This section shall not be construed to impose any additional regulatory responsibilities or workload on the board. The board may collaborate, as appropriate, with the Legislature and other stakeholders to inform future policy discussions through existing processes and expertise.SEC. 10. Section 3504 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3504. (a) There is established a Physician Assistant Board. The board consists of nine members.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 11. Section 3504.2 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:3504.2. Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of Section 3504 renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committee of the Legislature.SEC. 12. Section 3509 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3509. It shall be the duty of the board to:(a) Establish standards for, and issue licenses to, applicants qualifying for licensure under this chapter as a physician assistant.(b) Require the examination of applicants for licensure as a physician assistant who meet the requirements of this chapter.SEC. 13. Section 3513 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3513. The board shall recognize the approval of training programs for physician assistants approved by a national accrediting organization. Physician assistant training programs accredited by a national accrediting agency approved by the board shall be deemed approved by the board under this section.SEC. 14. Section 3514.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3514.1. The board shall formulate by regulation guidelines for the consideration of applications for licensure as a physician assistant.SEC. 15. Section 3516 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3516. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a physician assistant licensed by the board shall be eligible for employment or supervision by a physician and surgeon who is not subject to a disciplinary condition imposed by the Medical Board of California prohibiting that employment or supervision.(b) Except as provided in Section 3502.5, a physician and surgeon shall not supervise more than eight physician assistants at any one time.(c) The Medical Board of California may restrict a physician and surgeon to supervising specific types of physician assistants including, but not limited to, restricting a physician and surgeon from supervising physician assistants outside of the field of specialty of the physician and surgeon.SEC. 16. Section 3521.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3521.1. The fees to be paid by physician assistants are to be set by the board as follows:(a) An application fee charged to each physician assistant applicant shall be sixty dollars ($60) and may be increased to not more than eighty dollars ($80).(b) An initial license fee charged to each physician assistant to whom a license is issued shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and may be increased to not more than five hundred dollars ($500).(c) A biennial license renewal fee charged to each physician assistant who holds a license shall be three hundred dollars ($300) and may be increased to not more than five hundred dollars ($500).(d) The delinquency fee is seventy-five dollars ($75).(e) The duplicate license fee is ten dollars ($10).(f) The fee for a letter of endorsement, letter of good standing, or letter of verification of licensure shall be fifty dollars ($50).SEC. 17. Section 3521.2 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 18. Section 3523 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3523. All physician assistant licenses shall expire at 12 midnight of the last day of the birth month of the licensee during the second year of a two-year term if not renewed.The board shall establish by regulation procedures for the administration of a birthdate renewal program, including, but not limited to, the establishment of a system of staggered license expiration dates and a pro rata formula for the payment of renewal fees by physician assistants affected by the implementation of the program.To renew an unexpired license, the licensee shall, on or before the date of expiration of the license, apply for renewal on an electronic form, or other form, provided by the board, accompanied by the prescribed renewal fee. Each application form shall contain a legal verification by the applicant certifying under penalty of perjury that the information provided by the applicant is true and correct.SEC. 19. Section 3537.45 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3537.45. The program established pursuant to this article shall not be funded, directly or indirectly, from an increase in the fees charged to physician assistants pursuant to Section 3521.1. This article does not excuse physician assistants trained pursuant to this article from paying the fees established pursuant to Section 3521.1.SEC. 20. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.